Chapter 5 The American Revolution


Moment of Decision:
Commitment and Sacrifice
 Even as the British army poured into Boston in 1774, demanding complete obedience to king and Parliament, few Americans welcomed the possibility of revolutionary violence. For many colonial families, it would have been easier, certainly safer, to accede to imperial demands for taxes enacted without their representation. But they did not do so. For the Patten family, the time of reckoning arrived in the spring of 1775. Matthew Patten had been born in Ulster, a Protestant Irishman, and with Scots-Irish friends and relatives, he migrated to New Hampshire, where they founded a settlement of fifty-six families known as Bedford. Matthew farmed the unpromising, rocky soil that he, his wife Elizabeth, and their children called home. In time, distant decisions about taxes and representation shattered the peace of Bedford, and the Patterns found themselves drawn into a war not of their own making but which, nevertheless, compelled them to sacrifice the security of everyday life for liberty. On April 20, 1775, accounts of Lexington and Concord reached Bedford. Matthew noted in his diary,

 “I Received the Melancholy news in the morning that General Gage’s troops had fired on our Countrymen at Concord yesterday.” His son John marched with neighbors in support of the Massachusetts soldiers. The departure was tense. The entire family helped John prepare. “Our Girls sit up all night baking bread and fitting things for him,” Matthew wrote. The demands of war had only just begun. In late 1775 John volunteered for an American march on British Canada. On the long trek over impossible terrain, the boy died. The father recorded his emotions in the diary. John “was shot through his left arm at Bunker Hill fight and now was lead after suffering much fategue to the place where he now lyes in defending the just Rights of America to whose end he came in the prime of life by means of that wicked Tyrannical Brute (nea worse than Brute) of Great Britain [George III]. He was Twenty four years and 31 days old.” The initial stimulus for rebellion came from the gentry, from the rich and wellborn, who resented Parliament’s efforts to curtail their rights within the British empire.

 Patten family farmstead in Bedford, New Hampshire.

 But as these influential planters, wealthy merchants, and prominent clergymen discovered, the revolutionary movement generated a momentum that they could not control. As relations with Britain deteriorated, particularly after 1765, the traditional leaders of colonial society encouraged the ordinary folk to join the protest—as rioters, as petitioners, and finally, as soldiers. Newspapers, sermons, and pamphlets helped transform what had begun as a squabble among the gentry into a mass movement, and once the people had become involved in shaping the nation’s destiny, they could never again be excluded.

 Had it not been for ordinary militiamen like John Patten in the various colonies, the British would have easily crushed American resistance. Although some accounts of the Revolution downplay the military side of the story, leaving the impression that a few famous “Founding Fathers” effortlessly carried the nation to independence, a more persuasive explanation must recognize the centrality of armed violence in achieving nationhood. The American Revolution involved a massive military commitment. If common American soldiers had not been willing to stand up to seasoned British troops, to face



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 the terror of the bayonet charge, independence would have remained a dream of intellectuals. Proportionate to the population, a greater percentage of Americans died in military service during the Revolution than in any war in American history, with the exception of the Civil War. he concept of liberty so magnificently expressed in revolutionary pamphlets was not, therefore, simply an abstraction, an exclusive concern of political theorists such as Thomas Jefferson and John Adams. It also motivated ordinary folk—the Patten family, for example—to take up weapons and risk death. Those who survived the ordeal were never quite the same, for the very experience of fighting, of assuming responsibility in battle and perhaps even of taking the lives of British officers, gave dramatic new meaning to the idea of social equality.

T


Structure of Colonial Society
 Why did Americans resist parliamentary taxation? Colonists who were alive during the 1760s did not anticipate the coming of national independence. It is only from a modern perspective that we see how the events of this period would lead to the formation of the United States. The colonists, of course, did not know what the future would bring. They would probably have characterized these years as “postwar,” as a time of heightened economic and political expectation following the successful conclusion of the Seven Years’ War (see Chapter 4). For many Americans, the period generated optimism. The population continued to grow. Indeed, in 1776, approximately 2.5 million people, black and white, were living in Great Britain’s thirteen mainland colonies. The striking ethnic and racial diversity of these men and women amazed European visitors who apparently rated homogeneity more highly than did the Americans. In 1775, for example, a traveler corrected the impression in London that the “colonists are the offspring of Englishmen.” To be sure, many families traced their roots to Great Britain, but one also encountered “French, Dutch, Germans innumerable, Indians, Africans, and a multitude of felons.” He then asked rhetorically, “Is it possible to tell which are the most turbulent amongst such a mixture of people?” The American population on the eve of independence was also extraordinarily young, a fact of great importance in understanding the development of effective political resistance. Nearly 60 percent of the American people were under age 21. This is a fact of considerable significance. At any given time, most people in this society were small children, and many of the young men who fought the British during the Revolution either had not been born or had been infants during the Stamp Act crisis. Any explanation for the coming of independence, therefore, must take into account the continuing political mobilization of so many young people. Postwar Americans also experienced a high level of prosperity. To be sure, some major port cities went through a difficult period as colonists who had been employed during the fighting were thrown out of work. Sailors and ship workers, for example, were especially vulnerable to layoffs of this sort. In general,

 however, white Americans did very well. The quality of their material lives was not substantially lower than that of the English. In 1774, the per capita wealth of the Americans—this figure includes blacks as well as whites—was £37.4. This sum exceeds the per capita wealth of many developing countries today. On the eve of revolution, £37.4 would have purchased about 310 bushels of wheat, 1,600 pounds of rice, 11 cows, or 6 horses. A typical white family of five—a father, mother, and three dependent children— not only would have been able to afford decent food, clothing, and housing but also would have had money left over with which to purchase consumer goods. Even the poorest colonists seem to have benefited from a rising standard of living, and although they may not have done as well as their wealthier neighbors, they too wanted to preserve gains they had made. Wealth, however, was not evenly distributed in this society. Regional variations were striking. The Southern Colonies enjoyed the highest levels of personal wealth in America, which can be explained in part by the ownership of slaves. More than 90 percent of America’s unfree workers lived in the South, and they represented a huge capital investment. Even without including the slaves in these wealth estimates, the South did quite well. In terms of aggregate wealth, the Middle Colonies also scored impressively. In fact, only New England lagged noticeably behind, a reflection of its relative inability to produce large amounts of exports for a growing world market.

Breakdown of Political Trust
 Ultimate responsibility for preserving the empire fell to George III. When he became king of England in 1760, he was only 22 years of age. The new monarch was determined to play an aggressive role in government. This decision caused considerable dismay among England’s political leaders. For decades, a powerful, though loosely associated, group of men who called themselves Whigs had set policy and controlled patronage. George II had accepted this situation, and so long as the Whigs in Parliament did not meddle with his beloved army, the king had let them rule the nation. In one stroke, George III destroyed this cozy relationship. He selected as his chief minister the Earl of Bute, a Scot whose chief qualification for office appeared to be his friendship with the young king. The Whigs who dominated Parliament were outraged. Bute had no ties with the members of the House of Commons; he owed them no favors. It seemed to the Whigs that with the appointment of Bute, George was trying to turn back the clock to the time before the Glorious Revolution, in other words, attempting to reestablish a personal Stuart monarchy free from traditional constitutional restraints. The Whigs blamed Bute for every wrong, real or imagined. George did not, in fact, harbor such arbitrary ambitions, but his actions threw customary political practices into doubt. By 1763 Bute, despairing of public life, left office. His departure, however, neither restored the Whigs to preeminence nor dampened the king’s enthusiasm for domestic politics. Everyone agreed George had the right to select whomever he desired for cabinet posts, but until 1770, no one seemed able to please the monarch. Ministers came and went, often for no other reason than George’s personal distaste. Because of this chronic instability, subministers (minor bureaucrats who directed routine

Structure of Colonial Society


 colonial affairs) did not know what was expected of them. In the absence of clear long-range policy, some ministers made narrowly based decisions; others did nothing. Most devoted their energies to finding a political patron capable of satisfying the fickle king. Talent played little part in the scramble for office, and incompetent hacks were advanced as frequently as were men of vision. With such turbulence surrounding him, the king showed little interest in the American colonies. The king, however, does not bear the sole responsibility for England’s loss of empire. The members of Parliament who actually drafted the statutes that gradually drove a wedge between the colonies and Britain must share the blame, for they failed to provide innovative answers to the explosive constitutional issues of the day. The problem was not stupidity or even obstinacy, qualities found in equal measure among all peoples. In part, the impasse resulted from sheer ignorance. Few Englishmen active in government had ever visited America. For those who attempted to follow colonial affairs, accurate information proved extremely difficult to obtain. Packet boats carrying passengers and mail sailed regularly between London and the various colonial ports, but the voyage across the Atlantic required at least four weeks. Furthermore, all correspondence was laboriously copied in longhand by overworked clerks serving in understaffed offices. One could not expect to receive from America an answer to a specific question in less than three months. As a result of the lag in communication between England and America, rumors sometimes passed for true accounts, and misunderstanding influenced the formulation of colonial policy. But failure of communication alone was not to blame for the widening gap between the colonies and England. Even when complete information was available, the two sides were often unable to understand each other’s positions. The central element in this Anglo-American debate was a concept known as parliamentary sovereignty . The English ruling classes viewed the role of Parliament from a historical perspective that most colonists never shared. They insisted that Parliament was the dominant element within the constitution. Indeed, this elective body protected rights and property from an arbitrary monarch. During the reign of the Stuarts, especially under Charles I (r. 1625–1649), the authority of Parliament had been challenged, and it was not until the Glorious Revolution of 1688 that the English crown formally recognized Parliament’s supreme authority in matters such as taxation. Almost no one, including George III, would have dissented from a speech made in 1766 before the House of Commons, in which a representative declared, “The parliament hath, and must have, from the nature and essence of the constitution, has had, and ever will have a sovereign supreme power and jurisdiction over every part of the dominions of the state, to make laws in all cases whatsoever.” The logic of this argument seemed self-evident to the British. In fact, parliamentary leaders could never quite understand why the colonists were so difficult to persuade. In frustration, Lord Hillsborough, the British secretary of state, admonished the colonial agent for Connecticut, “It is essential to the constitution to preserve the supremacy of Parliament inviolate; and tell your friends in America . . . that it is as much their interest to support the constitution and preserve the supremacy of Parliament as it is ours.”



 Cartoons became a popular means of criticizing government during this period. Here, King George III watches as the kilted Lord Bute slaughters the goose America. A cabinet member holds a basket of golden eggs at rear. At front left, a dog relieves itself on a map of North America.

No Taxation Without Representation:
The American Perspective
 Americans most emphatically did not see it in their “interest” to maintain the “supremacy of Parliament.” The crisis in imperial relations forced the colonists fi rst to defi ne and then to defend principles deeply rooted in their own political culture. For more than a century, their ideas about the colonies’ role within the British empire had remained a vague, untested bundle of assumptions about personal liberties, property rights, and representative institutions. By 1763, however, certain fundamental American beliefs had become clear. From Massachusetts to Georgia, colonists aggressively defended the powers of the provincial assemblies. They drew on a rich legislative history of their own. Over the course of the century, the American assemblies had steadily expanded their authority over taxation and expenditure. Since no one in Britain bothered to clip their legislative wings, these provincial bodies assumed a major role in policy making and routine administration. In other words, by midcentury the assemblies looked like American copies of Parliament. It seemed unreasonable, therefore, for the British suddenly to insist on the supremacy of Parliament, for as the legislators of Massachusetts observed in 1770, “This house has the same inherent rights in this province as the house of commons in Great Britain.” The constitutional debate turned ultimately on the meaning of representation itself. In 1764, a British official informed the colonists that even though they had not elected members to Parliament—indeed, even though they had had no direct contact



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 with the current members—they were nevertheless “virtually” represented by that august body. The members of Parliament, he declared, represented the political interests of everyone who lived in the British empire. It did not really matter whether everyone had cast a vote. The colonists ridiculed this notion of virtual representation. The only representatives the Americans recognized as legitimate were those actually chosen by the people for whom they spoke. On this crucial point they would not compromise. As John Adams insisted, a representative assembly should actually mirror its constituents: “It should think, feel, reason, and act like them.” Since the members of Parliament could not possibly “think” like Americans, it followed logically they could not represent them. And if they were not genuine representatives, the members of Parliament— pretensions to sovereignty notwithstanding—had no business taxing the American people. Thus, in 1764 the Connecticut Assembly declared in bold letters, “NO LAW CAN BE MADE OR ABROGATED WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE PEOPLE BY THEIR REPRESENTATIVES.”

Ideas About Power and Virtue
 Americans expressed their political beliefs in a language they had borrowed from English writers. The person most frequently cited was John Locke, the influential seventeenth-century philosopher whose Two Treatises of Government (first published in 1690) seemed, to colonial readers at least, a brilliant description of what was in fact American political practice. Locke claimed that all people possessed natural and inalienable rights. To preserve these God-given rights of life, liberty, and property, for example, free men (the status of women in Locke’s work was less clear) formed contracts. These agreements were the foundation of human society as well as civil government, and they required the consent of the people who were actually governed. There could be no coercion. Locke justified rebellion against arbitrary forms of government that were by their very nature unreasonable. Americans delighted in Locke’s ability to unite traditional religious values with a spirited defense of popular government, and even when they did not fully understand his technical writings, they seldom missed a chance to quote from the works of “the Great Mr. Locke.” Colonial Americans also enthusiastically subscribed to the so-called Commonwealthman tradition, a body of political assumptions generally identified with two eighteenth-century English publicists, John Trenchard and Thomas Gordon (see Chapter 4). The writings of such figures—most of whom spent their lives in political opposition—helped persuade the colonists that power was extremely dangerous, a force that would surely destroy liberty unless it was countered by virtue. Persons who shared this highly charged moral outlook regarded bad policy as not simply the result of human error. Rather, it was an indication of sin and corruption. Insistence on public virtue—sacrifice of self-interest to the public good—became the dominant theme of revolutionary political writing. American pamphleteers seldom took a dispassionate, legalistic approach to their analysis of power and liberty. More commonly, they exposed plots hatched by corrupt courtiers, such as the Earl of Bute. None of them—or their readers—had any doubt that Americans were more virtuous than were the people of England.

 During the 1760s, however, popular writers were not certain how long the colonists could hold out against arbitrary taxation, standing armies, Anglican bishops—in other words, against a host of external threats designed to crush American liberty. In 1774, for example, the people of Farmington, Connecticut, declared that “the present ministry, being instigated by the devil and led by their wicked and corrupt hearts, have a design to take away our liberties and properties, and to enslave us forever.” Indeed, these Connecticut farmers described Britain’s leaders as “pimps and parasites.” This highly emotional, conspiratorial rhetoric sometimes shocks modern readers who assume that America’s revolutionary leaders were products of the Enlightenment, persons who relied solely on reason to solve social and political problems. Whatever the origins of their ideas may have been, the colonial pamphleteers successfully roused ordinary men and women to resist Britain with force of arms. Colonial newspapers spread these ideas through a large dispersed population. A majority of adult white males—especially those in the Northern Colonies—were literate, and it is not surprising that the number of journals published in this country increased dramatically during the revolutionary period. For the first time in American history, persons living in various parts of the continent could closely follow events that occurred in distant American cities. Because of the availability of newspapers, the details of Bostonians’ confrontations with British authorities were known throughout the colonies, and these shared political experiences drew Americans more closely together, making it possible—in the words of John Adams—for “Thirteen clocks . . . to strike together—a perfection of mechanism which no artist had ever before effected.”

Eroding the Bonds of Empire
 What events eroded the bonds of empire during the 1760s? The Seven Years’ War saddled Great Britain with a national debt so huge that more than half the annual national budget went to pay the interest on it. Almost everyone in government assumed that with the cessation of hostilities, the troops would be disbanded, thus saving a lot of money. George III had other plans. He insisted on keeping the largest peacetime army in British history on active duty, supposedly to protect Indians from predatory frontiersmen and to preserve order in the newly conquered territories of Florida and Quebec. Maintaining such a force so far distant from the mother country fueled the budgetary crisis. The growing financial burden weighed heavily on restive English taxpayers and sent government leaders scurrying in search of new sources of revenue. For their part, colonists doubted the value of this expensive army. Britain did not leave enough troops in America to maintain peace on the frontier effectively. The weakness of the army was dramatically demonstrated during the spring of 1763. The native peoples of the backcountry—the Seneca, Ottawa, Miami, Creek, and Cherokee—had begun discussing how they might turn back the tide of white settlement. The powerful spiritual leader Neolin, known as the Delaware Prophet and claiming vision from the “Master of Life,” helped these Indians articulate their fear and anger. He urged them to restore their cultures to the “original state that

Eroding the Bonds of Empire


 they were in before the white people found out their country.” If moral regeneration required violence, so be it. Neolin converted Pontiac, an Ottawa warrior, to the cause, and he, in turn, coordinated an uprising among the western Indians who had been French allies and who hated all British people—even those sent to protect them from land-grabbing colonists. The formidable Native American resistance was known as Pontiac’s Rebellion. In May, Pontiac attacked Detroit; other Indians harassed the Pennsylvania and Virginia frontiers. At the end of the year, after his followers began deserting, Pontiac sued for peace. During even this brief outbreak, the British army proved unable to defend exposed colonial settlements, and several thousand people lost their lives. From the perspective of the Native Americans who inhabited the Ohio Valley this was a period of almost unmitigated disaster. In fact, more than any other group, the Indians suffered as a direct result of imperial reorganization. The defeat of the French made it impossible for native peoples to play off one imperial power against European rivals (see Chapter 4), and the victorious British made it clear that they regarded their former Indian allies as little more than a nuisance. Diplomatic gifts stopped; humiliating restrictions were placed on trade. But even worse, Pontiac’s rising unloosed vicious racism along the colonial frontier, and American colonists often used any excuse to attack local Indians, peaceful or not. Late in 1763, a group of vigilantes known as the Paxton Boys murdered a score of Christian Indians, women and children, living near Lancaster, Pennsylvania. White neighbors treated the killers as heroes, and the atrocity ended only after the Paxton Boys threatened to march on Philadelphia in search of administrators who dared to criticize such cold-blooded crimes. One of the administrators, Benjamin Franklin, observed sadly, “It grieves me to hear that our Frontier People are yet greater Barbarians than the Indians, and continue to murder them in time of Peace.” Whatever happened to the Indians, the colonists fully intended to settle the fertile region west of the Appalachian Mountains. After the British government issued the Proclamation of 1763, which prohibited governors from granting land beyond the headwaters of rivers flowing into the Atlantic, disappointed Americans viewed the army as an obstruction to legitimate economic development, a domestic police force that cost too much money.

Paying Off the National Debt
 The task of reducing England’s debt fell to George Grenville, the rigid, somewhat unimaginative chancellor of the exchequer who replaced Bute in 1763 as the king’s first minister. After carefully reviewing the state of Britain’s finances, Grenville concluded that the colonists would have to contribute to the maintenance of the army. The first bill he steered through Parliament was the Revenue Act of 1764, known as the Sugar Act. This legislation placed a new burden on the Navigation Acts that had governed the flow of colonial commerce for almost a century (see Chapter 3). Those acts had forced Americans to trade almost exclusively with Britain. The statutes were not, however, primarily intended as a means to raise money for the British government. The Sugar Act—and the acts that soon followed—redefined the relationship between America and Great Britain. Parliament now expected the colonies to generate revenue. The preamble of the Sugar Act proclaimed explicitly: “It is just and necessary that



Read the Document


James Otis, The Rights of
 the British Colonies Asserted and Proved

 James Otis, Jr. (1725-1783) of Massachusetts was a brilliant lawyer, a prolific writer, and a strong supporter of colonial rights. He is credited with being one of the first Patriots to declare that “Taxation Without Representation is Tyranny!”

 a revenue be raised . . . in America for defraying the expenses of defending, protecting, and securing the same.” The purpose of the Sugar Act was to discourage smuggling, bribery, and other illegalities that prevented the Navigation Acts from being profitable. Parliament reduced the duty on molasses (set originally by the Molasses Act of 1733) from 6 to 3 pence per gallon. At so low a rate, Grenville reasoned, colonial merchants would have little incentive to bribe customs collectors. Much needed revenue would be diverted from the pockets of corrupt officials into the treasury so that it might be used to maintain the army. Grenville had been too clever by half. The Americans immediately saw through his unconstitutional scheme. According to the members of the Rhode Island Assembly, the Sugar Act taxed the colonists in a manner “inconsistent with their rights and privileges as British subjects.” James Otis, a fiery orator from Massachusetts, exclaimed the legislation deprived Americans of “the right of assessing their own taxes.”

 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 The act generated no violence. In fact, ordinary men and women were only marginally involved in the drafting of formal petitions. The protest was still confined to the members of the colonial assemblies, to the merchants, and to the well-to-do Americans who had personal interests in commerce.

 Word of the Stamp Act reached America in May, and it was soon clear that Barré had gauged the colonists’ response correctly. The most dramatic incident occurred in Virginia’s House of Burgesses. Patrick Henry, young and eloquent, whom contemporaries compared in fervor to evangelical preachers, introduced five resolutions protesting the Stamp Act on the floor of the assembly. He timed his move carefully. It was late in the session; many of the more conservative burgesses had already departed for their plantations. Even then, Henry’s resolves declaring that Virginians had the right to tax themselves as they alone saw fit passed by narrow margins. The fifth resolution, stricken almost immediately from the legislative records, announced that any attempt to collect stamp revenues in America was “illegal, unconstitutional, and unjust, and has a manifest tendency to destroy British as well as American liberty.” Henry was carried away by the force of his own rhetoric. He reminded his fellow Virginians that Caesar had had his Brutus, Charles I his Cromwell, and he hoped that “some good American would stand up for his country”—but an astonished speaker of the house cut Henry off in mid-sentence, accusing him of treason. The Virginia Resolves might have remained a local matter had it not been for the colonial press. Newspapers throughout America printed Henry’s resolutions, but, perhaps because editors did not really know what had happened in Williamsburg, they reported that all five resolutions had received the burgesses’ full support. Several journals even carried two resolves that Henry had not dared to introduce. A result of this misunderstanding, of course, was that the Virginians appeared to have taken an extremely radical

Popular Protest
 Passage of the Stamp Act of 1765 transformed a debate among gentlemen into a mass political movement. The imperial crisis might have been avoided. Colonial agents had presented Grenville with alternative schemes for raising money in America. But Grenville was a stubborn man, and he had little fear of parliamentary opposition. The majority of the House of Commons assumed that Parliament possessed the right to tax the colonists, and when the chancellor of the exchequer announced a plan to squeeze £60,000 annually out of the Americans by requiring them to purchase special seals or stamps to validate legal documents, the members responded with enthusiasm. The Stamp Act was scheduled to go into effect on November 1, 1765, and in anticipation of brisk sales, Grenville appointed stamp distributors for every colony. During discussion in Parliament, several members warned that the act would raise a storm of protest in the colonies. Colonel Isaac Barré, a veteran of the Seven Years’ War, reminded his colleagues that the Americans were “sons of liberty” and would not surrender their rights without a fight. But Barré’s appeal fell on deaf ears.

 MAINE (part of Mass.)

GREAT BRITAIN

Lake Huron


Lumber


 FRANCE

Skins


Lake O


N.H.


 ntario

Beef Cattle
N.Y.
Sheep
Hogs


Skins




Line of


 l am

 ati

 on

 VA.

Hemp


Corn


Cuba


Hogs
Wheat Norfolk
Beef Cattle
Naval
Stores
Beef Cattle
Lumber


Hogs




Caribbean Sea


Slav
 es

 Rice and indigo Fishing



, Gol
 d, Pep per

Tobacco


Ironworks




Ru
 m

Hispaniola
Jamaica
WEST INDIES

 Wheat and corn

Charles Town


Savannah
Corn


SPAIN PORTUGAL

AT L A N T I C OCEAN

N.C.


Naval
Lumber Stores
Beef Cattle
Naval
S.C.
Stores Beef Cattle


 GA.

ATLANTIC OCEAN

 a ol ,M r ar Ha g , Su ruit F

 eat, Lumber ur, M

Wheat


Charles
Town


 EUROPE

 in um, Gra Rice, Meat, R Manufactures, Wine

Flo


Skins


Philadelphia


Sugar, Molasses
Slaves


 oc Pr

Lumber


DEL.
Skins 
Cod


 res Sto

 res actu Manuf

PA. MD.

Boston


 l ava o, N dig n I , kins ctures co, S ufa Tobac Man

Boston
MASS.
Newport Whales New York CONN. Newport Beef Cattle Philadelphia R.I. Norfolk N.J. New York 
 rie eE Lak

Beef
Cattle


NORTH AMERICA

 s dw ses oo , d



 200 miles

 200 kilometers

SOUTH AMERICA

Shipbuilding
 Rum distilleries

COLONIAL PRODUCTS AND TRADE
Although the American colonists produced many agricultural staples that were valuable to Britain, they were dependent on British manufactures such as cloth, metal goods, and ceramics. 
 AFRICA

Eroding the Bonds of Empire




 By November 1, 1765, stamp distributors in almost every American port had publicly Read the Document Benjamin Franklin, Testimony Against resigned, and without distributors, the hated revthe Stamp Act (1766) enue stamps could not be sold. The courts soon reopened; most newspapers were published. Daily life in the colonies was undisturbed with one exception: The Sons of Liberty persuaded— some said coerced—colonial merchants to boycott British goods until Parliament repealed the Stamp Act. The merchants showed little enthusiasm for such tactics, but the threat of tar and feathers stimulated cooperation. The boycott movement was in itself a masterful political innovation. Never before had a resistance movement organized itself so centrally around the market decisions of ordinary consumers. The colonists depended on British imports— The Stamp Act placed a tax on documents and printed matter—newspapers, marriage licenses, wills, cloth, metal goods, and ceramics—and each year deeds, even playing cards and dice. The stamps (like those shown here) varied in denomination. A tax they imported more consumer goods than they stamp affixed to a legal document or bill of sale signified that the required tax had been paid. could possibly afford. In this highly charged moral atmosphere, one in which ordinary people position on the issue of the supremacy of Parliament, one that other talked constantly of conspiracy and corruption, it is not surprising Americans now trumpeted before their own assemblies. No wonthat Americans of different classes and backgrounds advocated a der Francis Bernard, royal governor of Massachusetts, called the radical change in buying habits. Private acts suddenly became part Virginia Resolves an “alarm bell.” of the public sphere. Personal excess threatened to contaminate Not to be outdone by Virginia, Massachusetts called a general the entire political community. This logic explains the power of an meeting to protest Grenville’s policy. Nine colonies sent representaappeal made in a Boston newspaper: “Save your money and you can tives to the Stamp Act Congress that convened in New York City save your country.” in October 1765. It was the first intercolonial gathering held since The boycotts mobilized colonial women. They were excluded the abortive Albany Congress of 1754; if nothing else, the new confrom voting and civil office, but such legal discrimination did not gress provided leaders from different regions with an opportunity mean that women were not part of the broader political culture. to discuss common problems. The delegates drafted petitions to the Since wives and mothers spent their days involved with household king and Parliament that restated the colonists’ belief “that no taxes chores, they assumed special responsibility to reform consumption, should be imposed on them, but with their own consent, given perto root out luxury, and to promote frugality. Indeed, in this realm sonally, or by their representatives.” The tone of the meeting was they possessed real power; they monitored the ideological commitrestrained, even conciliatory. The congress studiously avoided any ment of the entire family. Throughout the colonies, women altered mention of independence or disloyalty to the crown. styles of dress, made homespun cloth, and shunned imported items Resistance to the Stamp Act soon spread from the assemblies to on which Parliament had placed a tax. the streets. By taxing deeds, marriage licenses, and playing cards, the Stamp Act touched the lives of ordinary women and men. Anonymous Failed Attempts to Save the Empire artisans and seamen, angered by Parliament’s apparent insensitivity and fearful that the statute would increase unemployment and povWhat most Americans did not yet know—after all, communicaerty, organized mass protests in the major colonial ports. tion with Britain required months—was that in July, Grenville Imperial politics played out on the streets of American cities had fallen from power. This unexpected shift came about not as traditional rivalries between neighborhood youths and antibecause the king thought Grenville’s policies inept, but rather Catholic sentiment suddenly was redirected against alleged parbecause George did not like the man. His replacement as first lord liamentary oppression. In Boston, the “Sons of Liberty” burned of the treasury, Lord Rockingham, was young, inexperienced, in effigy the local stamp distributor, Andrew Oliver, and when and terrified of public speaking, a serious handicap to launchthat action failed to bring about his resignation, they tore down ing a brilliant parliamentary career. The Rockinghamites—as his one of his office buildings. Even after he resigned, the mob nearly followers were called—envisioned a prosperous empire founded demolished the elegant home of Oliver’s close associate, Lieutenant on an expanding commerce and local government under the Governor Thomas Hutchinson. The violence frightened colonial gentle guidance of Parliament. Rockingham wanted to repeal leaders, yet evidence suggests that they encouraged the lower the Stamp Act, but because of the shakiness of his own politiclasses to intimidate royal officials. Popular participation in these cal coalition, he could not announce such a decision until it protests was an exciting experience for people who had traditionenjoyed broad national support. He, therefore, urged merchants ally deferred to their social betters. After 1765, it was impossible and manufacturers throughout England to petition Parliament for either royal governors or patriot leaders to take for granted the for repeal of the act, claiming that the American boycott support of ordinary men and women. would soon drive them into bankruptcy and spark urban riots.



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 On March 18, 1766, the House of Commons voted 275 to 167 to rescind the Stamp Act. Lest its retreat on the Stamp Act be interpreted as weakness, the House of Commons passed the Declaratory Act (March 1766), a shrill defense of parliamentary supremacy over the Americans “in all cases whatsoever.” The colonists’ insistence on no taxation without representation failed to impress British rulers. England’s merchants, supposedly America’s allies, claimed sole responsibility for the Stamp Act repeal. The colonists had only complicated the task, the merchants lectured, and if the Americans knew what was good for them, they would keep quiet. To George Mason, a leading political figure in Virginia, such advice sounded patronizing. The British merchants seemed to be saying, “We have with infinite difficulty and fatigue got you excused this one time; pray be a good boy for the future, do what your papa and mama bid you, and hasten to return them your most grateful acknowledgements for condescending to let you keep what is your own.” This, Mason snapped, was “ridiculous!” The Stamp Act crisis also eroded the colonists’ respect for imperial officeholders in America. Suddenly, these men—royal governors, customs collectors, military personnel—appeared alien, as if their interests were not those of the people over whom they exercised authority. One person who had been forced to resign the post of stamp distributor for South Carolina noted several years later, “The Stamp Act had introduc’d so much Party Rage, Faction, and Debate that the ancient Harmony, Generosity, and Urbanity for which these People were celebrated is destroyed, and at an End.” Similar reports came from other colonies, and it is testimony to the Americans’ lingering loyalty to the British crown and constitution that rebellion did not occur in 1765.

Listen to the Audio File


“The Liberty Song”


Fueling the Crisis
 Rockingham’s ministry soon gave way to a government headed once again by William Pitt, who was now the Earl of Chatham. The aging Pitt suffered horribly from gout, and during his long absences from London, Charles Townshend, his chancellor of the exchequer, made important policy decisions. Townshend was an impetuous man whose mouth often outran his mind. During a parliamentary debate in January 1767, he surprised everyone by blithely announcing that he knew a way to obtain revenue from the Americans. The members of the House of Commons were so pleased with the news that they promptly voted to lower English land taxes, an action that threatened fiscal chaos. A budgetary crisis forced Townshend to make good on his extraordinary boast. His scheme turned out to be a grab bag of duties on American imports of paper, glass, paint, lead, and tea, which collectively were known as the Townshend Revenue Acts (June–July 1767). He hoped to generate sufficient funds to pay the salaries of royal governors and other imperial officers, thus freeing them from dependence on the colonial assemblies. The chancellor recognized that without tough instruments of enforcement, his duties would not produce the promised revenues. Therefore, he created an American Board of Customs Commissioners, a body based in Boston and supported by reorganized vice-admiralty courts located in Boston, Philadelphia,

 The boycott movement drew many colonial women into popular politics. In this 1774 woodcut, a Daughter of Liberty stands ready to resist British oppression.

 and Charles Town. And for good measure, Townshend induced Parliament to order the governor of New York to veto all bills passed by that colony’s assembly until it supplied resident British troops in accordance with the Quartering Act (May 1765) that required the colonies to house soldiers in barracks, taverns, and vacant buildings and to provide the army with firewood, candles, and beer, among other items. Many Americans regarded this as more taxation without representation, and in New York, at least, colonists refused to pay. Colonists showed no more willingness to pay Townshend’s duties than they had to buy Grenville’s stamps. No congress was called; none was necessary. Recent events had taught people how to coordinate protest, and they moved to resist the unconstitutional revenue acts. In major ports, the Sons of Liberty organized boycotts of British goods. Protest often involved what one historian has termed “rituals of nonconsumption.” In some large towns, these were moments of public moral reaffirmation. Men and women took oaths before neighbors promising not to purchase certain goods until Parliament repealed unconstitutional

Eroding the Bonds of Empire




 taxation. In Boston, ordinary people were encouraged to sign and artisans. Work was already in short supply, and the streets “Subscription Rolls.” “The Selectmen strongly recommend this crackled with tension. Measure to Persons of all ranks,” announced the Boston Gazette, When colonists questioned why the army had been sent to a “as the most honorable and effectual way of giving public peaceful city, pamphleteers responded that it was there to further Testimony of their Love to their Country, and of endeavouring a conspiracy originally conceived by Bute to oppress Americans, to to save it from ruin.” take away their liberties, and to collect illegal revenues. Grenville, On February 11, 1768, the Massachusetts House of Hillsborough, Townshend: They were all, supposedly, part of the Representatives drafted a circular letter, a provocative appeal plot. Today such rhetoric may sound excessive, but to Americans which it sent directly to the other colonial assemblies. The letwho had absorbed the political theories of the Commonwealthmen, ter requested suggestions on how best to thwart the Townshend a pattern of tyranny seemed obvious. Acts; not surprisingly, legislators in other parts of America, busy Colonists had no difficulty interpreting the violence that with local matters, simply ignored this general appeal. But not erupted in Boston on March 5, 1770. In the gathering dusk of that Lord Hillsborough, England’s secretary for American affairs. This afternoon, young boys and street toughs threw rocks and snowballs rather mild attempt to create a united colonial front struck him as at soldiers in a small, isolated patrol outside the offices of the hated gross treason, and he ordered the Massachusetts representatives customs commissioners in King Street. The details of this incident to rescind their “seditious paper.” After considering Hillsborough’s are obscure, but it appears that as the mob grew and became more demand, the legislators voted 92 to 17 to defy him. threatening, the soldiers panicked. In the confusion, the troops Suddenly, the circular letter became a cause célèbre. The fired, leaving five Americans dead. royal governor of Massachusetts hastily dissolved the House Pamphleteers promptly labeled the incident a massacre. of Representatives. That decision compelled the other coloThe victims of this Boston Massacre were seen as martyrs and nies to demonstrate their support for Massachusetts. Assembly were memorialized in extravagant terms. In one eulogy, Joseph after assembly now felt obligated to take up the circular letter, Warren addressed the dead men’s widows and children, dramatan action Hillsborough had specifically forbidden. Assemblies ically re-creating the gruesome scene in King Street. “Behold in other colonies were dissolved, creating a much broader crisis of representative government. Throughout America, the number 92 Read the Document Boston Gazette Description of the (the number of legislators who voted against Boston Massacre Hillsborough) immediately became a symbol of patriotism. In fact, Parliament’s challenge had brought about the very results it most wanted to avoid: a foundation for intercolonial communication and a strengthening of conviction among the colonists of the righteousness of their position.

Fatal Show of Force
 In October 1768, British rulers made another mistake, one that raised tensions almost to the pitch they had reached during the Stamp Act riots. The issue at the heart of the trouble was the army. In part to save money and in part to intimidate colonial trouble makers, the ministry transferred four thousand regular troops from Nova Scotia and Ireland to Boston. Most of the army had already been withdrawn from the frontier to the seacoast to save revenue, thereby raising more acutely than ever the issue of why troops were in America at all. The armed strangers camped on the Boston Common, and when citizens passed the site, redcoats shouted obscenities. Sometimes, in accordance with martial law, an errant soldier was whipped within an inch of his life, a bloody sight that sickened Boston civilians. To make relations worse, redcoats—men who were ill treated and underpaid—competed in their spare time for jobs with local dockworkers

 Outrage over the Boston Massacre was fanned by propaganda, such as this etching by Paul Revere, which showed British redcoats firing on ordinary citizens. In subsequent editions, the blood spurting from the dying Americans became more conspicuous.



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 thy murdered husband gasping on the ground,” Warren cried, “. . . take heed, ye orphan babes, lest, whilst your streaming eyes are fixed upon the ghastly corpse, your feet slide on the stones bespattered with your father’s brains.” Apparently, to propagandists like Warren, it mattered little that the five civilians had been bachelors! Paul Revere’s engraving of the massacre, appropriately splattered with blood, became an instant best-seller. Confronted with such intense reaction and with the possibility of massive armed resistance, Crown officials wisely moved the army to an island in Boston Harbor. At this critical moment, the king’s new first minister restored a measure of tranquility. Lord North, congenial, well-meaning, but not very talented, became chancellor of the exchequer following Townshend’s death in 1767. North was appointed the first minister in 1770, and for the next twelve years—indeed, throughout most of the American crisis—he managed to retain his office. His secret formula seems to have been an ability to get along with George III and to build an effective majority in Parliament. One of North’s first recommendations to Parliament was the repeal of the Townshend duties. Not only had these ill-conceived duties unnecessarily angered the colonists, but they also hurt English manufacturers. By taxing British exports such as glass and paint, Parliament had only encouraged the Americans to develop their own industries; thus, without much prodding, the House of Commons dropped all the Townshend duties—with the notable exception of tea. The tax on tea was retained not for revenue purposes, North insisted, but as a reminder that England’s rulers still subscribed to the principles of the Declaratory Act. They would not compromise the supremacy of Parliament. In mid-1770, however, the matter of tea seemed trivial to most Americans. The colonists had drawn back from the precipice, a little frightened by the events of the past two years, and desperately hoped to head off future confrontation with the British.

Last Days of Imperial Rule, 1770–1773
 For a short while, American colonists and British officials put aside their recent animosities. Like England’s rulers, some colonial gentry were beginning to pull back from protest, especially violent confrontation with established authority, in fear that the lower orders were becoming too assertive. It was probably in this period that Loyalist Americans emerged as an identifiable group. Colonial merchants returned to familiar patterns of trade, pleased no doubt to end the local boycotts that had depressed the American economy. British goods flooded into colonial ports; the level of American indebtedness soared to new highs. In this period of apparent reconciliation, the people of Massachusetts—even of Boston—decided they could accept their new governor, Thomas Hutchinson. After all, he was one of their own, an American. But appearances were deceiving. The bonds of imperial loyalty remained fragile, and even as Lord North attempted to win the colonists’ trust, Crown officials in America created new strains. Customs commissioners whom Townshend had appointed to collect his duties remained in the colonies long after his Revenue Acts had been repealed. If they had been honest, unobtrusive administrators, perhaps no one would have taken notice of their behavior. But the customs commissioners

 regularly abused their powers of search and seizure and in the process lined their own pockets. In Massachusetts, Rhode Island, and South Carolina—to cite the most notorious cases— these officials drove local citizens to distraction by enforcing the Navigation Acts with such rigor that a small boat could not cross Narragansett Bay with a load of firewood without first obtaining a sheaf of legal documents. One slip, no matter how minor, could bring confiscation of ship and cargo. The commissioners were not only corrupt; they were also shortsighted. If they had restricted their extortion to the common folk, they might have avoided becoming a major American grievance. But they could not control their greed. Some customs officers harassed the wealthiest, most powerful men around, men such as John Hancock of Boston and Henry Laurens of Charles Town. The commissioners’ actions drove some members of the colonial ruling class into opposition to the king’s government. When in the summer of 1772 a group of disguised Rhode Islanders burned a customs vessel, the Gaspee, Americans cheered. A special royal commission sent to arrest the culprits discovered that not a single Rhode Islander had the slightest idea how the ship could have come to such an end. Samuel Adams (1722–1803) refused to accept the notion that the repeal of the Townshend duties had secured American liberty. During the early 1770s, while colonial leaders turned to other matters, Adams kept the cause alive with a drumfire of publicity. He reminded the people of Boston that the tax on tea remained in force. He organized public anniversaries commemorating the repeal of the Stamp Act and the Boston Massacre. Adams was a genuine revolutionary, an ideologue filled with a burning sense of indignation at the real and alleged wrongs suffered by his countrymen. To his contemporaries, this man resembled a figure out of New England’s Puritan past. He seemed obsessed with the preservation of public virtue. The American goal, he declared, was the creation of a “Christian Sparta,” an ideal commonwealth in which vigilant citizens would constantly guard against the spread of corruption, degeneracy, and luxury. With each new attempt by Parliament to assert its supremacy over the colonists, more and more Bostonians listened to what Adams had to say. He observed ominously that the British intended to use the tea revenue to pay judicial salaries, thus freeing the judges from dependence on the assembly. When in November 1772 Adams suggested the formation of a committee of correspondence to communicate grievances to villagers throughout Massachusetts, he received broad support. Americans living in other colonies soon copied his idea. It was a brilliant stroke. Adams developed a structure of political cooperation completely independent of royal government.

The Final Provocation: The Boston
Tea Party
 In May 1773, Parliament passed the Tea Act, legislation the Americans might have welcomed. After all, it lowered the price for their favorite beverage. Parliament wanted to save one of Britain’s largest businesses, the East India Company, from possible bankruptcy. This commercial giant imported Asian tea into England, where it was resold to wholesalers. The tea was also

Eroding the Bonds of Empire


Read the Document




George R.T. Hewes, “A Retrospect on the Boston Tea Party”


 Colonists toss chests of tea overboard while disguised as Mohawk Indians in a historic depiction of the Boston Tea Party of December 16, 1773. At right, a bottle of tea leaves preserved from the protest suggests that one participant or onlooker was mindful of the historical importance of the event.

 subject to heavy duties. The company tried to pass these charges on to the consumers, but American tea drinkers preferred the cheaper leaves that were smuggled in from Holland. The Tea Act changed the rules. Parliament not only allowed the company to sell directly to American retailers, thus cutting out intermediaries, but also eliminated the duties paid in England. If all had gone according to plan, the agents of the East India Company in America would have undersold their competitors, including the Dutch smugglers, and with the new profits would have saved the business. But Parliament’s logic was flawed. First, since the tax on tea, collected in American ports, remained in effect, this new act seemed a devious scheme to win popular support for Parliament’s right to tax the colonists without representation. Second, the act threatened to undercut powerful colonial merchants who did a good business trading in smuggled Dutch tea. Considering the American reaction, the British government might have been well advised to devise another plan to rescue the ailing company. At Philadelphia, and then at New York City, colonists turned back the tea ships before they could unload. In Boston, however, the issue was not so easily resolved. Governor Hutchinson, a strong-willed man, would not permit the vessels to return to England. Local patriots would not let them unload. And so, crammed with the East India Company’s tea, the ships sat in Boston Harbor waiting for the colonists to make up their minds. On the night of December 16, 1773, they did so in dramatic

 style. A group of men disguised as Mohawk Indians boarded the ships and pitched 340 chests of tea worth £10,000 over the side. Whether Samuel Adams organized the famed Boston Tea Party is not known. No doubt he and his allies were not taken by surprise. Even at the time, John Adams, Samuel’s distant cousin, sensed the event would have far-reaching significance. “This Destruction of the Tea,” he scribbled in his diary, “is so bold, so daring, so firm, intrepid, and inflexible, and it must have so important consequences, and so lasting, that I can’t but consider it as an epocha in history.” When news of the Tea Party reached London in January 1774, the North ministry was stunned. The people of Boston had treated parliamentary supremacy with utter contempt, and British rulers saw no humor whatsoever in the destruction of private property by subjects of the Crown dressed in costume. To quell such rebelliousness, Parliament passed a series of laws called the Coercive Acts. (In America, they were referred to as the Intolerable Acts.) The legislation (1) closed the port of Boston until the city fully compensated the East India Company for the lost tea; (2) restructured the Massachusetts government by transforming the upper house from an elective to an appointed body and restricting the number of legal town meetings to one a year; (3) allowed the royal governor to transfer British officials arrested for offenses committed in the line of duty to England, where there was little likelihood they would be convicted; and (4) authorized the army to quarter troops wherever they were needed, even if this required the compulsory requisition of uninhabited private buildings. George III enthusiastically supported this tough policy; he appointed



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

CHRONICLE OF COLONIAL—BRITISH TENSION
Legislation Sugar Act 
Date
April 5, 1764


Stamp Act


 March 22, 1765; repealed March 18, 1766

Quartering Act


May 1765


Declaratory Act


March 18, 1766


Townshend
Revenue Acts


June 26, 29, July 2, 1767; all
 repealed—except duty on tea, March 1770 May 10, 1773

Tea Act


Coercive Acts
(Intolerable Acts)


March–June 1774


Prohibitory Act


December 22, 1775


Provisions
 Revised duties on sugar, coffee, tea, wine, other imports; expanded jurisdiction of vice-admiralty courts Printed documents (deeds, newspapers, marriage licenses, etc.) issued only on special stamped paper purchased from stamp distributors Colonists must supply British troops with housing, other items (candles, firewood, etc.) Parliament declares its sovereignty over the colonies “in all cases whatsoever” New duties on glass, lead, paper, paints, tea; customs collections tightened in America Parliament gives East India Company right to sell tea directly to Americans; some duties on tea reduced Closes port of Boston; restructures Massachusetts government; restricts town meetings; troops quartered in Boston; British officials accused of crimes sent to England or Canada for trial Declares British intention to coerce Americans into submission; embargo on American goods; American ships seized

 General Thomas Gage to serve as the colony’s new royal governor. Gage apparently won the king’s favor by announcing that in America, “Nothing can be done but by forcible means.” The sweeping denial of constitutional liberties confirmed the colonists’ worst fears. To men like Samuel Adams, it seemed as if Britain really intended to enslave the American people. Colonial moderates found their position shaken by the vindictiveness of the Coercive Acts. Edmund Burke, one of America’s last friends in Parliament, noted sadly on the floor of Commons, that “This is the day, then, that you wish to go to war with all America, in order to conciliate that country to this.” If in 1774 the House of Commons thought it could isolate Boston from the rest of America, it was in for a rude surprise. Colonists living in other parts of the continent recognized immediately that the principles at stake in Boston affected all Americans. As one Virginian explained, “There were no Heats and Troubles in Virginia till the Blockade of Boston.” Few persons advocated independence, but they could not remain passive while Boston was destroyed. They sent food and money and, during the fall of 1774, reflected more deeply than ever on what it meant to be a colonist in the British empire.

Colonial Reaction
 Several assemblies protest taxation for revenue Riots in cities; collectors forced to resign; Stamp Act Congress (October 1765) Protest in assemblies; New York Assembly punished for failure to comply, 1767 Ignored in celebration over repeal of the Stamp Act Nonimportation of British goods; assemblies protest; newspapers attack British policy Protests against favoritism shown to monopolistic company; tea destroyed in Boston (December 16, 1773) Boycott of British goods; First Continental Congress convenes (September 1774)

Drives Continental Congress
 closer to decision for independence

 The sticking point remained—as it had been in 1765—the sovereignty of Parliament. No one in Britain could think of a way around this constitutional impasse. In 1773, Benjamin Franklin had offered a suggestion. “The Parliament,” he observed, “has no right to make any law whatever, binding on the colonies . . . the king, and not the king, lords, and commons collectively, is their sovereign.” But so long as it still seemed possible to coerce the Americans into obedience, to punish these errant children, Britain’s rulers had little incentive to accept such a humiliating compromise.

Steps Toward Independence
 What events in 1775 and 1776 led to the colonists’ decision to declare independence? During the summer of 1774, committees of correspondence analyzed the perilous situation in whic h the colonists found themselves. Something, of course, had to be done. But what? Would the Southern Colonies support resistance in New England? Would Pennsylvanians stand up to Parliament? Not surprisingly, the committees endorsed a

Steps Toward Independence


 call for a Continental Congress, a gathering of fifty-five elected delegates from twelve colonies (Georgia sent none but agreed to support the action taken). This First Continental Congress convened in Philadelphia on September 5. It included some of America’s most articulate, respected leaders; among them were John Adams, Samuel Adams, Patrick Henry, Richard Henry Lee, Christopher Gadsden, and George Washington. The delegates were strangers to one another. They knew little about the customs and values, the geography and economy of Britain’s other provinces. As John Adams explained on September 18, “It has taken Us much Time to get acquainted with the Tempers, Views, Characters, and Designs of Persons and to let them into the Circumstances of our Province.” During the early sessions of the Congress, the delegates eyed each other closely, trying to gain a sense of the strength and integrity of the men with whom they might commit treason. Differences of opinion soon surfaced. Delegates from the Middle Colonies—Joseph Galloway of Pennsylvania, for example—wanted to proceed with caution, but Samuel Adams and other more radical members pushed the moderates toward confrontation. Boston’s master politician engineered congressional commendation of the Suffolk Resolves, a bold statement drawn up in Suffolk County, Massachusetts, that encouraged forcible resistance of the Coercive Acts. After this decision, the tone of the meeting was established. Moderate spokesmen introduced conciliatory measures, which received polite discussion but failed to win a majority vote. Just before returning to their homes (September 1774), the delegates created the “Association,” an intercolonial agreement to halt all commerce with Britain until Parliament repealed the Intolerable Acts. This was a totally revolutionary decision. The Association authorized a vast network of local committees to enforce nonimportation. Violators were exposed, shamed, forced either to apologize publicly for their actions or to be shunned by all their patriot neighbors. In many of the communities, the committees were the government, distinguishing, in the words of James Madison, “Friends from Foes.” George III sneered at these activities. “I am not sorry,” he confided, “that the line of conduct seems now chalked out . . . the New England Governments are in a state of Rebellion, blows must decide whether they are to be subject to this country or independent.”

Shots Heard Around the World
 The king was correct. Before Congress reconvened, “blows” fell at Lexington and Concord, two small farm villages in eastern Massachusetts. On the evening of April 18, 1775, General Gage dispatched troops from Boston to seize rebel supplies. Paul Revere, a renowned silversmith and active patriot, warned the colonists that the redcoats were coming. The militia of Lexington, a collection of ill-trained farmers, boys as well as old men, decided to stand on the village green on the following morning, April 19, as the British soldiers passed on the road to Concord. No one planned to fight, but in a moment of confusion, someone (probably a colonist) fired; the redcoats discharged a volley, and eight Americans lay dead. Word of the incident spread rapidly, and by the time the British force reached its destination, the countryside swarmed with



 “minutemen,” special companies of Massachusetts militia prepared to respond instantly to military emergencies. The redcoats found nothing of significance in Concord and so returned. The long march back to Boston turned into a rout. Lord Percy, a British officer who brought up reinforcements, remarked more in surprise than bitterness that “whoever looks upon them [the American soldiers] as an irregular mob, will find himself much mistaken.” On June 17, colonial militiamen again held their own against seasoned troops at the battle of Bunker Hill (actually Breed’s Hill). The British finally took the hill, but after this costly “victory” in which he suffered 40 percent casualties, Gage complained that the Americans had displayed “a conduct and spirit against us, they never showed against the French.”

Beginning “The World Over Again”
 Members of the Second Continental Congress gathered in Philadelphia in May 1775. They faced an awesome responsibility. British government in the mainland colonies had almost ceased to function, and with Americans fighting redcoats, the country desperately needed strong central leadership. Slowly, often reluctantly, Congress took control of the war. The delegates formed a Continental Army and appointed George Washington its commander, in part because he seemed to have greater military experience than anyone else available and in part because he looked like he should be commander in chief. The delegates were also eager to select someone who did not come from Massachusetts, a colony that seemed already to possess too much power in national councils. The members of Congress purchased military supplies and, to pay for them, issued paper money. But while they were assuming the powers of a sovereign government, the congressmen refused to declare independence. They debated and fretted, listened to the appeals of moderates who played on the colonists’ remaining loyalty to Britain, and then did nothing. The British government appeared intent on transforming colonial moderates into angry rebels. In December 1775, Parliament passed the Prohibitory Act, declaring war on American commerce. Until the colonists begged for pardon, they could not trade with the rest of the world. The British navy blockaded their ports and seized American ships on the high seas. Lord North also hired German mercenaries (the Russians drove too hard a bargain) to put down the rebellion. And in America, Virginia’s royal governor Lord Dunmore further undermined the possibility of reconciliation by urging the colony’s slaves to take up arms against their masters. Few did so, but the effort to stir up black rebellion infuriated the Virginia gentry. Thomas Paine (1737–1809) pushed the colonists even closer to independence. Nothing in this man’s background suggested he would write the most important pamphlet in American history. In England, Paine had tried and failed in a number of jobs, and exactly why he elected to move to America in 1774 is not clear. While still in England, Paine had the good fortune to meet Benjamin Franklin, who presented him with letters of introduction to the leading patriots of Pennsylvania. At the urging of his new American friends, Paine produced Common Sense, an essay that became an instant best-seller. In only three months, it sold more than 120,000 copies.



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 Common Sense systematically stripped kingship of historical and theological justification. For centuries, the English had maintained the fiction that the monarch could do no wrong. When the government oppressed the people, the royal counselors received the blame. The Crown was above suspicion. To this, Paine cried nonsense. Monarchs ruled by force. George III was simply a “royal brute,” who by his arbitrary behavior had surrendered his claim to the colonists’ obedience. The pamphlet also attacked the whole idea of a mixed and balanced constitution. Indeed, Common Sense was a powerful democratic manifesto. Paine’s greatest contribution to the revolutionary cause was persuading ordinary folk to sever their ties with Great Britain. It was not reasonable, he argued, to regard England as the mother country. “Europe, and not England,” he explained, “is the parent country of America. This new world hath been the asylum for the persecuted lovers of civil and religious liberty from every part of Europe.” No doubt that message made a deep impression on Pennsylvania’s German population. The time had come for the colonists to form an independent republic. “We have it in our power,” Paine wrote in one of his most moving statements, “to begin the world over again . . . the birthday of a new world is at hand.”

Read the Document


 On July 2, 1776, after a long and tedious debate, Congress finally voted for independence. The motion passed: twelve states for, none against (with New York abstaining). Thomas Jefferson, a young Virginia lawyer and planter who enjoyed a reputation as a graceful writer, drafted a formal declaration that was accepted with alterations two days later. Much of the Declaration of Independence consisted of a list of specific grievances against George III and his government. Like the skilled lawyer he was, Jefferson presented the evidence for independence. The document did not become famous for those passages. Long after the establishment of the new republic, the Declaration challenged Americans to make good on the principle that “all men are created equal.” John Adams nicely expressed the patriots’ fervor when he wrote on July 3, “Yesterday the greatest question was decided, which ever was debated in America, and a greater perhaps, never was or will be decided among men.” Many revolutionary leaders throughout the modern world— in Europe as in Asia—have echoed Adams’s assessment. Of all the documents written during this period, including the Constitution, the Declaration of Independence remains the most powerful and radical invitation to Americans of all backgrounds to demand their equality and full rights as human beings.

Thomas Paine, A Freelance Writer Urges His Readers to Use Common Sense


 The message of Thomas Paine’s pamphlet Common Sense (title page shown) was clear and direct. Paine’s powerful argument called for “The Free and Independent States of America.” He assured ordinary Americans not only that they could live without a king, but also that they would win the war.

Fighting for Independence


Watch the Video




The American Revolution As Different Americans Saw It


 Congress Voting Independence, oil painting by Robert Edge Pine and Edward Savage, 1785. The committee appointed by Congress to draft a declaration of independence included (center, standing) John Adams, Roger Sherman, Robert Livingston, Thomas Jefferson, and (center foreground, seated) Benjamin Franklin. The committee members are shown submitting Jefferson’s draft to the speaker.

Fighting for Independence
 Why did it take eight years of warfare for the Americans to gain independence? Only fools and visionaries expressed optimism about America’s prospects of winning independence in 1776. The Americans had taken on a formidable military power. The population of Britain was perhaps four times that of its former colonies. England also possessed a strong manufacturing base, a well-trained regular army supplemented by thousands of hired German troops (Hessians), and a navy that dominated the world’s oceans. Many British officers had battlefield experience. They already knew what the Americans would slowly learn: Waging war requires discipline, money, and sacrifice. As later events demonstrated, however, Britain had become involved in an impossible military situation, in some ways analogous to that in which the United States would find itself in Vietnam some two hundred years later. Three separate elements neutralized advantages held by the larger power over its adversary. First, the British had to transport men and supplies across the Atlantic, a logistic challenge of unprecedented complexity. Unreliable lines of communication broke down under the strain of war.

 Second, America was too vast to be conquered by conventional military methods. Redcoats might gain control over the major port cities, but as long as the Continental Army remained intact, the rebellion continued. As Washington explained, “the possession of our Towns, while we have an Army in the field, will avail them little . . . It is our Arms, not defenceless Towns, they have to subdue.” Even if England had recruited enough soldiers to occupy the entire country, it would still have lost the war. As one Loyalist instructed the king, “if all America becomes a garrison, she is not worth your attention.” Britain could only win by crushing the American will to resist. And third, British strategists never appreciated the depth of the Americans’ commitment to a political ideology. In the wars of eighteenth-century Europe, such beliefs had seldom mattered. European troops before the French Revolution served because they were paid or because the military was a vocation, but most certainly not because they hoped to advance a set of constitutional principles. Americans were different. To be sure, some young men were drawn to the military by bounty money or by the desire to escape unhappy families. A few were drafted. But taking such people into account, one still encounters among the American troops a remarkable commitment to republican ideals. One French officer reported from the United



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 States, “It is incredible that soldiers composed of men of every age, even of children of fifteen, of whites and blacks, almost naked, unpaid, and rather poorly fed, can march so well and withstand fire so steadfastly.”

Building a Professional Army
 During the earliest months of rebellion, American soldiers— especially those of New England—suffered no lack of confidence. Indeed, they interpreted their courageous stands at Concord and Bunker Hill as evidence that brave yeomen farmers could lick British regulars on any battlefield. George Washington spent the first years of the war disabusing the colonists of this foolishness, for as he had learned during the French and Indian War, military success depended on endless drill, careful planning, and tough discipline—rigorous preparation that did not characterize the minutemen’s methods. Washington insisted on organizing a regular well-trained field army. Some advisers urged the commander in chief to wage a guerrilla war, one in which small partisan bands would sap Britain’s will to rule Americans. But Washington rejected that course. He recognized that the Continental Army served not only as a fighting force but also as a symbol of the republican cause. Its very existence would sustain American hopes, and so long as the army survived, American agents could plausibly solicit foreign aid. This thinking shaped Washington’s wartime strategy; he studiously avoided “general actions” in which the Continental Army might be destroyed. Critics complained about Washington’s caution, but as they soon discovered, he understood better than they what independence required. If the commander in chief was correct about the army, however, he failed to comprehend the political importance of the militia. These scattered, almost amateur, military units seldom altered the outcome of battle, but they did maintain control over large areas of the country not directly affected by the British army. Throughout the war, they compelled men and women who would rather have remained neutral to actively support the American effort. In 1777, for example, the militia of Farmington, Connecticut, visited a group of suspected Tories, as Loyalists (people who sided with the king and Parliament during the Revolution) were called, and after “educating” these people in the fundamentals of republican ideology, a militia spokesman announced, “They were indeed grossly ignorant of the true grounds of the present war with Great Britain . . . [but] They appeared to be penitent of their former conduct, [and] professed themselves convinced . . . that there was no such thing as remaining neuters.” Without local political coercion, Washington’s task would have been considerably more difficult. For the half million African American colonists, most of them slaves, the fight for independence took on special poignancy. After all, they wanted to achieve personal as well as political freedom, and many African Americans supported those who seemed most likely to deliver them from bondage. As one historian explained, “The black soldier was likely to join the side that made him the quickest and best offer in terms of those ‘unalienable rights’ of which Mr. Jefferson had spoken.” It is estimated that some five thousand African Americans took up arms to fight against the British. The Continental Army included two all-black units, one from Massachusetts and the other from Rhode Island. In 1778, the legislature of Rhode Island voted to free any slave who volunteered to serve, since, according to the lawmakers, history taught that “the wisest, the freest, and bravest

 nations . . . liberated their slaves, and enlisted them as soldiers to fight in defence of their country.” In the South, especially in Georgia and South Carolina, more than ten thousand African Americans supported the British, and after the patriots had won the war, these men and women left the United States, relocating to Nova Scotia, Florida, and Jamaica, with some eventually resettling in Africa.

Testing the American Will
 After the embarrassing defeats in Massachusetts, the king appointed General Sir William Howe to replace the ill-fated Gage. British rulers now understood that a simple police action would not be sufficient to crush the American rebellion. Parliament authorized sending more than fifty thousand troops to the mainland colonies, and after evacuating Boston—an untenable strategic position—the British forces stormed ashore at Staten Island in New York Harbor on July 3, 1776. From this more central location, Howe believed he could cut the New Englanders off from the rest of America. He enjoyed the powerful support of the British navy under the command of his brother, Admiral Lord Richard Howe. When Washington learned the British were planning to occupy New York City, he transferred many of his inexperienced soldiers to Long Island, where they suffered a major defeat (August 27, 1776). In a series of engagements disastrous for the Americans, Howe drove the Continental Army across the Hudson River into New Jersey. Because of his failure to take full advantage of the situation, however, General Howe lost what seemed in retrospect an excellent opportunity to annihilate Washington’s entire army. Nevertheless, the Americans were on the run, and in the fall of 1776, contemporaries predicted the rebels would soon capitulate.

 “Times That Try Men’s Souls” Swift victories in New York and New Jersey persuaded General Howe that few Americans enthusiastically supported independence. He issued a general pardon, therefore, to anyone who would swear allegiance to George III. The results were encouraging. More than three thousand men and women who lived in areas occupied by the British army took the oath. This group included one intimidated signer of the Declaration of Independence. Howe perceived that a lasting peace in America would require his troops to treat “our enemies as if they might one day become our friends.” A member of Lord North’s cabinet grumbled that this was “a sentimental manner of making war,” a shortsighted view considering England’s experience in attempting to pacify the Irish. The pardon plan eventually failed not because Howe lacked toughness but because his soldiers and officers regarded loyal Americans as inferior provincials, an attitude that did little to promote good relations. In any case, as soon as the redcoats left a pardoned region, the rebel militia retaliated against those who had deserted the patriot cause. In December 1776, Washington’s bedraggled army retreated across the Delaware River into Pennsylvania. American prospects appeared bleaker than at any other time during the war. The Continental Army lacked basic supplies, and many men who had signed up for short-term enlistments prepared to go home. “These are the times that try men’s souls,” Paine wrote in a pamphlet titled American Crisis. “The summer soldier and the sunshine patriot will, in this crisis, shrink from the service of their

Fighting for Independence


View the Map


The American Revolution


Quebec
Dec. 31, 1775


Retreat of
Montgomery and Arnold
May 7, 1776


Carleton
Three Rivers
June 7, 1776
Montgomery


 r io

Arnold


Oriskany
Aug. 6, 1777


Gates


N.H.
Bennington
Aug. 16, 1777
Newburyport


 MASS.

Concord
 Siege of Boston British retreat to Nova Scotia July 1775–March 1776 March 17, 1776

 we , 1 Ho h 17 am rc Washington's illi Ma White Plains Retreat ir W lifax Oct. 28, 1776 S Ha Is. m ng Morristown fro Brooklyn Heights New York Lo Winter Quarters 1777 Aug. 27, 1776 o we Germantown Admiral H Oct. 4, 1777 Aug. 17 from England Valley Forge Monmouth Winter Quarters Court House 1777–1778 June 28, 1778 PENN. Brandywine N.J. Princeton Sept. 11, 1777 Jan. 3, 1777 Trenton Dec. 26, 1776 MD. Philadelphia Washington and captured Rochambeau Sept. 26, 1777

R.I.


 CONN.

 ie

 m fro

 e

How


 ves

Lin
 cla m at io n

 te et

 VIRGINIA

Pr
 o

Yorktown
Aug. 30–Oct. 19, 1781


G
 ra ss

Camden
Aug. 16, 1780


Wilmington


Co
 d an om n fr nto 80 Cli h1 c r Ma

Co r n
 wallis

Eutaw Springs
Sept. 8, 1781


 rn N wa ew ll Yo i s rk

Gree
 n

 e

 e

Mo
 rg Co an rn wa llis

 de

Cornwallis


 allis

 e

 GEORGIA

NORTH CAROLINA

Cor
 nw

Green


S.C.
Ninety–Six
 abandoned by British June 1781

AT L A N T I C OCEAN

Battles of the Virginia Capes
Sept. 5–9, 1781


 Americans hoped to defeat British by forcing Cornwallis to divide his troops

Cowpens
Jan. 17, 1781


Clinton
Town July 1776


 y Lafa

Howe


Guilford Courthouse
Mar. 15, 1781


Kings Mountain
Oct. 7, 1780


 rles Cha

Ho
 od and Gra

Er


 e of 763

 ke

Lexington
Apr. 19, 1775
Bunker Hill
June 17, 1775
Howe


Albany


NEW YORK

La




Saratoga
 Burgoyne surrenders Oct. 17, 1777 Bemis Heights Oct. 7, 1777

Ar
 no ld

St


 er eg .L

Burgoyne


Lake Hu
 ron



Ft. Halifax


BRITISH NORTH AMERICA (CANADA)

O n ta




 British launch invasions to detach New England

Lake


Arnold


Montreal
Nov. 13, 1775


Charles Town
May 12, 1780


Savannah
 fell to British 1778





 100 miles

 100 kilometers American troop movements British troop movements French troop movements

 British attempt to push through Carolinas and Virginia

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION, 1775–1781

 American victories British victories Mixed results

 The War for Independence ranged over a huge area. Battles were fought in the colonies, on the western frontier, and along the Gulf of Mexico. The major engagements of the first years of the war, from the spontaneous rising at Concord in 1775 to Washington’s well-coordinated attack on Trenton in December 1776, were fought in the Northern Colonies. In the middle theater of war, Burgoyne’s attempt in 1777 to cut off New England from the rest of the colonies failed when his army was defeated at Saratoga. Action in the final years of the war, from the battles at Camden, Kings Mountain, Cowpens, and Guilford Courthouse to the fina l victory at Yorktown, occurred in the southern theater of war.



 Complete the Assignment Spain’s Contribution to American Independence on myhistorylab

Feature
Essay


 Spain’s Contribution to American Independence

S


 pain made a significant, although much underappreciated contribution to the winning of American independence. The decision to support American resistance against Great Britain came in 1779. After an American army had won a stunning victory at the Battle of Saratoga in 1778, Spain joined its ally France in a global contest against Britain that stretched from the banks of the Mississippi River to the islands of the Caribbean and the Straits of Gibraltar. Spain had little interest in advancing the revolutionary principles of “life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.” After all, as a traditional monarchy, it was not enthusiastic about championing a radical cause associated with popular rights. Rather, the declaration of war against Britain reflected Spain’s desire for revenge against a long-standing enemy that had seized Gibraltar in 1713 and Florida in 1763. Sensing that British military forces around the world were stretched too thin, Spain and France prepared for a conflict designed to regain lost possessions and restore imperial glory. British leaders appreciated immediately the seriousness of the danger. They knew that it was one thing to fight the insurgent armies of George Washington, quite another to take on two major European powers. Confronting the new threat, Lord George Germain, the British secretary of state, assured the British people that his government would “pursue the war in North America with the utmost vigor.” He faced a very difficult



 challenge. War with France and Spain forced Britain to reallocate key military resources in ways that took pressure off the struggling American army. Germain ordered half of the 16,000 troops then occupying Philadelphia diverted to other vulnerable regions. Approximately 5,000 were transferred to the West Indies where they guarded against the possibility of French and Spanish attacks against Britain’s lucrative sugar trade.

 Another 3,000 were posted in Florida, Spain’s former colony. In fact, worried that French and Spanish warships might attack vital supply lines, British leaders finally abandoned Philadelphia altogether, a move that allowed Washington to retake the city without having to fire a shot. Anxious to recapture Florida, the Spanish launched a bold campaign against British forts located along the

 coast of the Gulf of Mexico. Their success owed a lot to the energy and courage of Bernardo de Gálvez, the Spanish Governor of Louisiana. Before taking this post, he had compiled an impressive military record, having fought against Spain’s enemies in Africa and the borderlands of northern Mexico. In fact, he received the governorship of Louisiana as a reward for his extraordinary service. Gálvez was determined to restore Spain’s honor in North America. As he announced, “The king [of Spain] has determined that the principal object of his arms in America during the present war will be to drive [the British] from the Mexican Gulf and the neighborhood of Louisiana.” Even before Spain had officially entered the war, Gálvez began sending vital military supplies from St. Louis—then governed by Spain—to American forces operating in the West. These materials helped George Rogers Clark win a string of strategic victories against British forces in the Illinois Territory in 1778. If Clark had failed, the United States could not have creditably claimed all the land east of the Mississippi River during the peace negotiations with Great Britain that ended the Revolution. In 1779, Gálvez moved decisively to drive the British from the region north of New Orleans, and in quick succession, he captured Manchac, Natchez, and Baton Rouge. Gálvez then turned his attention to regaining Florida. The first obstacle was Mobile. In March 1780, after a two-week siege, the British

 garrison surrendered to Gálvez’s troops. Pensacola presented a much greater military challenge. It served as Britain’s administrative and commercial center for West Florida. Moreover, it was well defended. Gálvez’s courage and amazing luck allowed the Spanish to carry the day. A Spanish fleet sailing out of Cuba joined ships transporting Gálvez’s soldiers in the waters off Pensacola. The admiral of the Cuban fleet was reluctant to enter the port. He feared that his vessels might run aground on sandbars. Gálvez would have none of it. He sailed his own ship boldly into the harbor, and inspired by his example, the captains of the other ships followed his lead. In March 1781, they landed over 7,000 soldiers. The Battle of Pensacola was hard fought. The Spanish siege lasted for over two months, and just as their ammunition was running out, a lucky shot hit the British powder magazine setting off a huge explosion that destroyed much of the fort. The British force—an army made up of British regulars, Native Americans, and American Loyalists— surrendered on May 10. Gálvez’s successful campaign had a major impact on the final year of the American Revolution. The growing military presence of Spain and France in the West Indies compelled the British to station troops in the area that could have been employed against the Continental Army in Yorktown and New York. Moreover, the fall of West Florida made it harder for the British to supply their soldiers and Indian allies operating in the Southern mainland colonies.

 Although Spain was unable to retake Gibraltar, Gálvez realized his goal of reclaiming Florida. He had overcome the humiliation of Spain’s previous defeats. In 1783 the Spanish Crown invited him to serve on the committee that would draw up the Peace of Paris ending the American Revolution. Even at this moment of triumph, though, Spain refused to recognize the sovereignty of the United States. It was not long before Spain had second thoughts about its victory over Great Britain. An aggressive new enemy appeared. Every year brought a flood of American settlers into Florida and the Mississippi Valley. They showed not the slightest respect for Spanish authority. In 1787 the Spanish Governor of Florida reported that the American backwoodsmen were “distinguished from savages only in their color, language, and the superiority of their depraved cunning and untrustworthiness.” He believed the frontiersmen migrated to Florida “to escape all legal authority.” Another Spanish official warned, “A new and independent power has arisen on our continent.” He was correct. In 1819 Spain was forced to transfer Florida to the United States.

QUESTIONS FOR DISCUSSION 1.
Why did Spain decide to enter the Revolutionary War? 2. Why did the Spanish government have misgivings about American independence? 




 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

 country, but he that stands it now deserves . . . love and thanks . . . .” Before winter, Washington determined to attempt one last desperate stroke. Howe played into Washington’s hands. The British forces were dispersed in small garrisons across the state of New Jersey, and while the Americans could not possibly have defeated the combined British army, they did possess the capacity—with luck—to capture an exposed post. On the night of December 25, Continental soldiers slipped over the ice-filled Delaware River and at Trenton took nine hundred sleeping Hessian mercenaries by complete surprise. Cheered by success, Washington returned a second time to Trenton, but on this occasion the Continental Army was not so fortunate. A large British force under Lord Cornwallis trapped the Americans. Instead of standing and fighting—really an impossible challenge—Washington secretly, by night, marched his little army around Cornwallis’s left flank. On January 3, 1777, the Americans surprised a British garrison at Princeton. Washington then went into winter quarters. The British, fearful of losing more outposts, consolidated their troops, thus leaving much of the state in the hands of the patriot militia.

Victory in a Year of Defeat
 In 1777, England’s chief military strategist, Lord George Germain, still perceived the war in conventional European terms. A large field army would somehow maneuver Washington’s Continental troops into a decisive battle in which the British would enjoy a clear advantage. Complete victory over the Americans certainly seemed within England’s grasp. Unfortunately for the men who advocated this plan, the Continental forces proved extremely elusive, and while one British army vainly tried to corner Washington in Pennsylvania, another was forced to surrender in the forests of upstate New York. In the summer of 1777, General John Burgoyne, a dashing though overbearing officer, descended from Canada with a force of more than seven thousand troops. They intended to clear the Hudson Valley of rebel resistance; join Howe’s army, which was to come up to Albany; and thereby cut New England off from the other states. Burgoyne fought in a grand style. Accompanied by a German band, thirty carts filled with the general’s liquor and belongings, and two thousand dependents and camp followers, the British set out to thrash the Americans. The campaign was a disaster. Military units, mostly from New England, cut the enemy force apart in the deep woods north of Albany. At the battle of Bennington (August 16), the New Hampshire militia under Brigadier General John Stark overwhelmed a thousand German mercenaries. After this setback, Burgoyne’s forces struggled forward, desperately hoping that Howe would rush to their rescue, but when it became clear that their situation at Saratoga was hopeless, the haughty Burgoyne was forced to surrender fifty-eight hundred men to the American General Horatio Gates (October 17). Soon after Burgoyne left Canada, General Howe unexpectedly decided to move his main army from New York City to Philadelphia. Exactly what he hoped to achieve was not clear, even to Britain’s rulers, and of course, when Burgoyne called for assistance, Howe was sitting in the new nation’s capital still trying to devise a way to destroy the Continental Army. Howe’s campaign began in late July.

 The British forces sailed to the head of the Chesapeake Bay and then marched north to Philadelphia. Washington’s troops obstructed the enemy’s progress, first at Brandywine Creek (September 11) and then at Paoli (September 20), but the outnumbered Americans could not stop the British from entering Philadelphia. Anxious lest these defeats discourage Congress and the American people, Washington attempted one last battle before the onset of winter. In an engagement at Germantown (October 4), the Americans launched a major counterattack on a fog-covered battlefield, but just at the moment when success seemed assured, they broke off the fight. “When every thing gave the most flattering hopes of victory,” Washington complained, “the troops began suddenly to retreat.” Bad luck, confusion, and incompetence contributed to the failure. A discouraged Continental Army dug in at Valley Forge, twenty miles outside of Philadelphia, where camp diseases took twenty-five hundred American lives. In their misery, few American soldiers realized their situation was not nearly as desperate as it had been in 1776.

The French Alliance
 Even before the Americans declared their independence, agents of the government of Louis XVI began to explore ways to aid the colonists, not so much because the French monarchy favored the republican cause but because it hoped to embarrass the English. The French deeply resented the defeat they had sustained during the Seven Years’ War. During the early months of the Revolution, the French covertly sent tons of essential military supplies to the Americans. The negotiations for these arms involved secret agents and fictitious trading companies, the type of clandestine operation more typical of modern times than of the eighteenth century. But when American representatives, Benjamin Franklin for one, pleaded for official recognition of American independence or for outright military alliance, the French advised patience. The international stakes were too great for the king to openly back a cause that had little chance of success. The American victory at Saratoga convinced the French that the rebels had formidable forces and were serious in their resolve. Indeed, Lord North drew the same conclusion. When news of Saratoga reached London, North muttered, “This damned war.” In private conversation, he expressed doubts about England’s ability to win the contest, knowing the French would soon enter the fray. In Paris, Franklin performed brilliantly. In meetings with French officials, he hinted that the Americans might accept a British peace initiative. If the French wanted the war to continue, if they really wanted to embarrass their old rival, then they had to do what the English refused: formally recognize the independence of the United States. The stratagem paid off handsomely. On February 6, 1778, the French presented American representatives with two separate treaties. The first, called the Treaty of Amity and Commerce, established commercial relations between France and the United States. It tacitly accepted the existence of a new, independent republic. The Treaty of Alliance was even more generous, considering America’s obvious military and economic weaknesses. In the event that France and England went to war (they did so on June 14, as everyone expected), the French agreed to reject “either Truce or Peace with Great Britain . . . until the independence of the United States

Fighting for Independence


 shall have been formally or tacitly assured by the Treaty or Treaties that shall terminate the War.” Even more amazing, France surrendered its claim to all territories formerly owned by Great Britain east of the Mississippi River. The Americans pledged they would not sign a separate peace with Britain without first informing their new ally. And in return, France made no claim to Canada, asking only for the right to take possession of certain British islands in the Caribbean. Never had Franklin worked his magic to greater effect. French intervention instantly transformed British military strategy. What had been a colonial rebellion suddenly became a world conflict, a continuation of the great wars for empire of the late seventeenth century (see Chapter 4). Scarce military resources, especially newer fighting ships, had to be diverted from the American theater to guard the English Channel. In fact, there was talk in London of a possible French invasion. Although the threat of such an assault was not very great until 1779, the British did have cause for concern. The French navy posed a serious challenge to the overextended British fleet. By concentrating their warships in a specific area, the French could hold off or even defeat British squadrons, an advantage that would figure significantly in the American victory at Yorktown.

The Final Campaign
 British General Henry Clinton replaced Howe, who resigned after the battle of Saratoga. Clinton was a strangely complex individual. As a subordinate officer, he had impressed his superiors as imaginative but easily provoked to anger. When he took command of the British army, his resolute self-confidence suddenly dissolved. Perhaps he feared failure. Whatever the explanation for his vacillation, Clinton’s record in America was little better than Howe’s or Gage’s. Military strategists calculated that Britain’s last chance of winning the war lay in the Southern Colonies, a region largely untouched in the early years of fighting. Intelligence reports reaching London indicated that Georgia and South Carolina contained a sizable body of Loyalists, men who would take up arms for the crown if only they received support and encouragement from the regular army. The southern strategy devised by Germain and Clinton in 1779 turned the war into a bitter guerrilla conflict, and during the last months of battle, British officers worried that their search for an easy victory had inadvertently opened a Pandora’s box of uncontrollable partisan furies. The southern campaign opened in the spring of 1780. Savannah had already fallen, and Clinton reckoned that if the British could take Charles Town, they would be able to control the entire South. A large fleet carrying nearly eight thousand redcoats reached South Carolina in February. Complacent Americans had allowed the city’s fortifications to decay, and in a desperate, last-minute effort to preserve Charles Town, General Benjamin Lincoln’s forces dug trenches and reinforced walls, but to no avail. Clinton and his second in command, General Cornwallis, gradually encircled the city, and on May 12, Lincoln surrendered an American army of almost six thousand men. The defeat took Congress by surprise, and without making proper preparations, it dispatched a second army to South Carolina under Horatio Gates, the hero of Saratoga. He too failed. At Camden, Cornwallis outmaneuvered the raw American recruits, capturing or killing 750 during the course of battle (August 16). Poor Gates galloped from the scene and did not stop until he reached Hillsboro, North Carolina, two hundred miles away.



MAJOR BATTLES OF THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
Battle Lexington Concord Bunker Hill Montreal Quebec Brooklyn Heights White Plains Trenton Princeton Bennington Brandywine Saratoga, First Battle: Freeman’s Farm Philadelphia Captured Germantown Saratoga, Second Battle: Bemis Heights Charles Town Camden Kings Mountain Cowpens Guilford Courthouse Yorktown 
Date
Apr. 19, 1775
Apr. 19, 1775
Jun. 17, 1775
Nov. 13, 1775
Dec. 31, 1775
Aug. 27, 1776
Oct. 28, 1776
Dec. 26, 1776
Jan. 3, 1777
Aug. 16, 1777
Sept. 11, 1777
Sept. 19, 1777


Victor
British
Americans
Mixed Results
Americans
British
British
British
Americans
Americans
Americans
British
Mixed Results


Sept. 26, 1777
Oct 4, 1777
Oct. 7, 1777


British
British
Americans


May 12, 1780
Aug. 16, 1780
Oct. 7, 1780
Jan. 17, 1781
Mar. 15, 1781
Aug. 30- Oct. 18,


British
British
Americans
Americans
British
Americans and
French


 Even at this early stage of the southern campaign, the dangers of partisan warfare had become evident. Tory raiders showed little interest in serving as regular soldiers in Cornwallis’s army. They preferred night riding, indiscriminate plundering or murdering of neighbors against whom they harbored ancient grudges. The British had unleashed a horde of banditti across South Carolina. Men who genuinely supported independence or who had merely fallen victim to Loyalist guerrillas bided their time. They retreated westward, waiting for their enemies to make a mistake. Their chance came on October 7 at King’s Mountain, North Carolina. In the most vicious fighting of the Revolution, the backwoodsmen decimated a force of British regulars and Tory raiders who had strayed too far from base. One witness reported that when a British officer tried to surrender, he was summarily shot down by at least seven American soldiers. Cornwallis, badly confused and poorly supplied, squandered his strength chasing American forces across the Carolinas. Congress sent General Nathanael Greene to the South with a new army. This young Rhode Islander was the most capable general on Washington’s staff. Greene joined Daniel Morgan, leader of the famed Virginia Riflemen, and in a series of tactically brilliant engagements, they sapped the strength of Cornwallis’s army, first at Cowpens, South Carolina (January 17, 1781), and later at Guilford Courthouse, North Carolina (March 15). Clinton fumed in New York City. In his estimation, the inept Cornwallis had left “two valuable colonies



 CHAPTER 5

THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION: FROM ELITE PROTEST TO POPULAR REVOLT, 1763–1783

BRI TI SH NO RTH AM ERI CA

NO VA

IA OT C S
Halifax 
The Loyalist Dilemma
 Why did so many Loyalists decide to leave the United States during the Revolution?

 No one knows for certain how many Americans actually supported the Crown N.H. during the Revolution. Some Loyalists Boston undoubtedly kept silent and avoided making ario t n NEW MASS. L. O YORK a public commitment that might have led to Newport CONN. (1776–1778) banishment or loss of property. But for many persons, neutrality proved impossible. Almost e R.I. i Er New York one hundred thousand men and women L. Philadelphia permanently left America. While a number (1777–1778) N.J. of these exiles had served as imperial office PA. AT L A N T I C OCEAN holders—Thomas Hutchinson, for example— MD. DEL. in the main, they came from all ranks and backgrounds. A large number of humble farmers, more than thirty thousand, resettled VIRGINIA in Canada. Others relocated to England, the Norfolk West Indies, or Africa. The political ideology of the Loyalists NORTH was not substantially different from that of CAROLINA their opponents. Like other Americans, they believed that men and women were entitled Wilmington to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. SOUTH The Loyalists were also convinced that indeCAROLINA pendence would destroy those values by proLoyalist strongholds Charleston moting disorder. By turning their backs on Indians: loyalist or neutral Britain, a source of tradition and stability, Savannah 200 miles Strongly contested areas GEORGIA the rebels seemed to have encouraged licen0 200 kilometers Patriot strongholds tiousness, even anarchy in the streets. The Loyalists suspected that Patriot demands for LOYALIST STRONGHOLDS The highest concentrations of Loyalists were in the colonies of freedom were self-serving, even hypocritiNew York, North Carolina, South Carolina, and Georgia, especially in the areas around port cities such cal, for as Perserved Smith, a Loyalist from as New York City, Wilmington, Charleston, and Savannah. Ashfield, Massachusetts, observed, “Sons of liberty . . . did not deserve the name, for it was evident all they wanted was liberty from oppression that they might have liberty behind him to be overrun and conquered by the very army which he to oppress!” boasts to have completely routed but a week or two before.” The Loyalists were caught in a difficult squeeze. The British Cornwallis pushed north into Virginia, planning apparently to never quite trusted them. After all, they were Americans. During the establish a base of operations on the coast. He selected Yorktown, early stages of the war, Loyalists organized militia companies and a sleepy tobacco market located on a peninsula bounded by the hoped to pacify large areas of the countryside with the support of the York and James rivers. Washington watched these maneuvers regular army. The British generals were unreliable partners, however, closely. The canny Virginia planter knew this territory intimately, for no sooner had they called on loyal Americans to come forward and he sensed that Cornwallis had made a serious blunder. When than the redcoats marched away, leaving the Tories exposed to rebel Washington learned the French fleet could gain temporary domiretaliation. And in England, the exiles found themselves treated as nance in the Chesapeake Bay, he rushed south from New Jersey. second-class citizens. While many of them received monetary comWith him marched thousands of well-trained French troops pensation for their sacrifice, they were never regarded as the equals of under the Comte de Rochambeau. All the pieces fell into place. native-born English citizens. Not surprisingly, the Loyalist commuThe French admiral, the Comte de Grasse, cut Cornwallis off from nity in London was gradually transformed into a collection of bitter the sea, while Washington and his lieutenants encircled the British men and women who felt unwelcome on both sides of the Atlantic. on land. On October 19, 1781, Cornwallis surrendered his entire Americans who actively supported independence saw these army of six thousand men. When Lord North heard of the defeat people as traitors who deserved their fate of constant, often vioat Yorktown, he moaned, “Oh God! It is all over.” The British still lent, harassment. In many states—but especially in New York— controlled New York City and Charles Town, but except for a few revolutionary governments confiscated Loyalist property. Other skirmishes, the fighting ended. The task of securing the indepenfriends of the king received beatings, or as the rebels called them, dence of the United States was now in the hands of the diplomats. L.

 VT.

Hu


 ro

A


P


 PA

 LA

C


 HI

 AN

 MO

 UN

 TA

 IN

S


 n

STUDY RESOURCES

 “grand Toory [sic] rides.” A few were even executed. According to one patriot, “A Tory is a thing whose head is in England, and its body in America, and its neck ought to be stretched.” Long after the victorious Americans turned their attentions to the business of building a new republic, Loyalists remembered a receding colonial past, a comfortable, ordered world that had been lost forever at Yorktown. Although many Loyalists eventually returned to their homes, a sizable number could not do so. For them, the sense of loss remained a heavy emotional burden. Perhaps the most poignant testimony came from a young mother living in exile in Nova Scotia. “I climbed to the top of Chipman’s Hill and watched the sails disappear in the distance,” she recounted, “and such a feeling of loneliness came over me that though I had not shed a tear through all the war I sat down on the damp moss with my baby on my lap and cried bitterly.”

Winning the Peace
How did Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and John
 Jay secure a better peace treaty than Congress could have expected? Congress appointed a skilled delegation to negotiate a peace treaty: Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and John Jay. According to their official instructions, they were to insist only on the recognition of the independence of the United States. On other issues, Congress ordered its delegates to defer to the counsel of the French government. But the political environment in Paris was much different from what the diplomats had been led to expect. The French had formed a military alliance with Spain, and French officials announced that they could not consider the details of an American settlement until after the Spanish had recaptured Gibraltar from the British. The prospects for a Spanish victory were not good, and in any case, it was well known that Spain coveted the lands lying between the Appalachian Mountains and the Mississippi River. Indeed, there were even rumors afloat in Paris that the great European powers might intrigue to deny the United States its independence. While the three American delegates publicly paid their respects to French officials, they secretly entered into negotiations with an English agent. The peacemakers drove a remarkable bargain, a much



 better one than Congress could have expected. The preliminary agreement, the Treaty of Paris of 1783, signed on September 3, not only guaranteed the independence of the United States; it also transferred all the territory east of the Mississippi River, except Spanish Florida, to the new republic. The treaty established generous boundaries on the north and south and gave the Americans important fishing rights in the North Atlantic. In exchange, Congress promised to help British merchants collect debts contracted before the Revolution and compensate Loyalists whose lands had been confiscated by the various state governments. Even though the Americans negotiated separately with the British, they did not sign a separate peace. The preliminary treaty did not become effective until France reached its own agreement with Great Britain. Thus did the Americans honor the French alliance. It is difficult to imagine how Franklin, Adams, and Jay could have negotiated a more favorable conclusion to the war. In the fall of 1783, the last redcoats sailed from New York City, ending 176 years of colonial rule.

Conclusion: Preserving
Independence
 The American people had waged war against the most powerful nation in Europe and emerged victorious. The treaty marked the conclusion of a colonial rebellion, but it remained for the men and women who had resisted taxation without representation to work out the full implications of republicanism. What would be the shape of the new government? What powers would be delegated to the people, the states, the federal authorities? How far would the wealthy, well-born leaders of the rebellion be willing to extend political, social, and economic rights? For many Americans the challenge of nation building appeared even more formidable than waging war against Great Britain. As Philadelphia physician Dr. Benjamin Rush explained, “There is nothing more common than to confound the terms of American Revolution with those of the late American war. The American war is over, but this is far from being the case with the American Revolution. On the contrary, nothing but the first act of the great drama is closed.”

Study Resources
 Take the Study Plan for Chapter 5 The American Revolution on MyHistoryLab

TIME LINE 1763
Peace of Paris ends the Seven Years’ War 1764 Parliament passes Sugar Act to collect American 
 revenue Stamp Act receives support of House of Commons (March); Stamp Act Congress meets in New York City (October)

 1766 Stamp Act repealed the same day that Declaratory Act becomes law (March 18)

 1767 Townshend Revenue Acts stir American anger (June–July)

 1768 Massachusetts assembly refuses to rescind circular letter (February)



 CHAPTER 5

CHAPTER REVIEW

 1770 Parliament repeals all Townshend duties except one

 on tea (March); British troops “massacre” Boston civilians (March) Samuel Adams forms committee of correspondence Lord North’s government passes Tea Act (May); Bostonians hold Tea Party (December) Parliament punishes Boston with Coercive Acts (March–June); First Continental Congress convenes (September) Patriots take stand at Lexington and Concord (April); Second Continental Congress gathers (May); Americans hold their own at Bunker Hill (June)

 1776 Congress votes for independence; Declaration of Independence is signed; British defeat Washington at Long Island (August); Americans score victory at Trenton (December) General Burgoyne surrenders at Saratoga (October) French treaties recognize independence of the United States (February) British take Charles Town (May) Washington forces Cornwallis to surrender at Yorktown (October) Peace treaty signed (September); British evacuate New York City (November)



CHAPTER REVIEW

 e

Graves


How


The Loyalist Dilemma
L.


E ri


 e N Philadelphia (1777–1778)

N.J.
 MD.

 DEL.

 Why did so many Loyalists decide to leave the United States during the Revolution?

 UN

 TA

 IN

S


 PA.

 VIRGINIA

 MO

 Almost 100,000 Loyalists permanently left America during the Revolution. While some Loyalists had held office under the Crown before the Revolution, many others believed that independence from Britain would destroy traditional values and lead to anarchy and new forms of oppression. (p. 126) LA

C


 HI

 AN

Norfolk


NORTH CAROLINA

 PA

 Wars in America were expensive. Parliament established the Proclamation Line of 1763 to reduce the costs of protecting the frontier, but this angered colonists seeking new lands in the west. Parliament also concluded that the colonists should help reduce the national debt, but when it passed the Stamp Act (1765), Americans protested. Colonists boycotted British manufactured goods. Taken aback, Parliament repealed the hated statute, while maintaining in the Declaratory Act (1766) its complete legislative authority over the Americans. (p. 108)

Howe


Clinto
Tow


 What events eroded the bonds of empire during the 1760s?

 To win their independence, the colonies first had to overcome the formidable military power of Great Britain. Britain had four times the population of the colonies, was the world’s leading manufacturer, had a well-trained and experienced army, and the world’s best navy. The outgunned colonists had to rely on a war of attrition. It was only after the victory at Saratoga in 1777 convinced the French to enter into an alliance that the colonists were able to win conclusive battles and successfully end the war. (p. 119) rles Cha

Eroding the Bonds of Empire


 Why did it take eight years of warfare for the Americans to gain independence?

 m fro

 During the 1760s British rulers claimed that Parliament could make laws for the colonists “in all cases whatsoever.” Americans challenged this “parliamentary sovereignty.” Drawing on the work of John Locke, the English philosopher, they insisted that God had given them certain natural and inalienable rights. By attempting to tax them without representation, Parliament threatened those rights. (p. 106)

R.I.


 CONN.

 Washington's White Plains Retreat Oct. 28, 1776 S Is. ng Morristown fro New York Lo Winter Quarters 1777 Germantown Ad Oct. 4, 1777 from E ey Forge Monmouth Quarters Court House 77–1778 June 28, 1778 andywine N.J. Princeton t. 11, 1777 Jan. 3, 1777 Trenton Dec. 26, 1776 MD. Philadelphia d captured u Sept. 26, 1777

Wilmington


P


 Why did Americans resist parliamentary taxation?

Fighting for Independence


A


Structure of Colonial Society


 SOUTH

Winning the Peace
Steps Toward Independence
 What events in 1775 and 1776 led to the colonists’ decision to declare independence?

How did Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and
 John Jay secure a better peace treaty than Congress could have expected?

 In 1775, following battles at Lexington and Concord, militiamen from throughout New England descended upon Boston, besieging the British troops encamped there. In response, the Continental Congress formed the Continental Army and appointed George Washington commander. In 1776, Thomas Paine’s Common Sense convinced colonists that a republic was a better form of government than monarchy, and Congress declared independence. (p. 116)

 Apart from insisting that Britain recognize the independence of the United States, Congress instructed Franklin, Adams, and Jay to defer to the counsels of the French government during the peace conference. But by conducting secret and separate negotiations with the British, the American delegates were also able to secure all the territory east of the Mississippi River except Spanish Florida for the new republic and to gain important fishing rights for Americans in the North Atlantic. (p. 127)

STUDY RESOURCES



KEY TERMS AND DEFINITIONS
Whigs In mid-eighteenth century Britain, the Whigs were a political faction that dominated Parliament. Generally, they opposed royal influence in government and wanted to increase the power of Parliament. In America, a Whig party coalesced in the 1830s in opposition to President Andrew Jackson. The American Whigs supported federal power and internal improvements but not territorial expansion. The Whig party collapsed in the 1850s. p. 106 Parliamentary sovereignty Principle that emphasized Parliament’s power to govern colonial affairs. p. 107 Stamp Act of 1765 Placed a tax on newspapers and printed matter produced in the colonies, causing mass opposition by colonists. p. 110 Stamp Act Congress Meeting of colonial delegates in New York City in October 1765 to protest the Stamp Act, a law passed by Parliament to raise revenue in America. p. 111 Boston Massacre A violent clash between British troops and a Boston mob on March 5, 1770. Five citizens were killed when the troops fired into the crowd. The incident inflamed anti-British sentiment in Massachusetts. p. 113 
 Coercive Acts Also known as the Intolerable Acts, the four pieces of legislation passed by Parliament in response to the Boston Tea Party to punish Massachusetts. p. 115 First Continental Congress A meeting of delegates from 12 colonies in Philadelphia in 1774, the Congress denied Parliament’s authority to legislate for the colonies, condemned British actions toward the colonies, created the Continental Association, and endorsed a call to take up arms. p. 117 Second Continental Congress A gathering of colonial representatives in Philadelphia in 1775 that organized the Continental Army and began requisitioning men and supplies for the war effort. p. 117 Common Sense Revolutionary tract written by Thomas Paine in 1776. It called for independence and a republican government in America. p. 117 Loyalists Colonists sided with Britain during the American Revolution. p. 120

 Committee of correspondence Communication network formed in Massachusetts and other colonies to communicate grievances and provide colonists with evidence of British oppression. p. 114

 Yorktown Virginia market town on a peninsula bounded by the York and James rivers, where Lord Cornwallis’s army was trapped by the Americans and French in 1781. p. 125

 Boston Tea Party Raid on British ships in which Patriots disguised as Mohawks threw hundreds of chests of tea owned by the East India Company into Boston Harbor to protest British taxes. p. 115

 Treaty of Paris of 1783 Agreement establishing American independence after the Revolutionary War. It also transferred territory east of the Mississippi River, except for Spanish Florida, to the new republic. p. 127

CRITICAL THINKING QUESTIONS 1.
Were British political leaders or American agitators more to blame for the imperial crisis? 
 3. Did Lexington and Concord make national independence inevitable? 4. Given the logistical problems facing the British, could they have

 2. With more enlightened leadership, could the king and Parliament have

 possibly won the Revolutionary War?

 preserved Britain’s American empire?

 MyHistoryLab Media Assignments Find these resources in the Media Assignments folder for Chapter 5 on MyHistoryLab Eroding the Bonds of Empire

Steps Toward Independence


Read the Document


James Otis, The Rights of the
British Colonies Asserted and Proved p. 109


Read the Document


Benjamin Franklin, Testimony
Against the Stamp Act (1766) p. 111


Listen to the Audio File


Read the Document


Thomas Paine, A Freelance
Writer Urges His Readers to Use Common Sense p. 118


◾


Watch the Video


The American Revolution As Different
Americans Saw It p. 119


“The Liberty Song” p. 112


Fighting for Independence
◾


Read the Document


◾


Read the Document


Boston Gazette Description of
 the Boston Massacre p. 113

George R.T. Hewes, “A
Retrospect on the Boston Tea Party” p. 115


◾
◾


View the Map


The American Revolution p. 121


Complete the Assignment


 Spain’s Contribution to American Independence p. 122

◾ Indicates Study Plan Media Assignment




The Republican
Experiment


Contents and Learning Objectives
DEFINING REPUBLICAN CULTURE PG. 131

STRENGTHENING FEDERAL AUTHORITY PG. 141

 What were the limits of equality in the “republican” society of the new United States?

 What did the nationalists call for and how did they aim to achieve their initiatives?

LIVING IN THE SHADOW OF REVOLUTION PG. 132

WE FOUGHT FOR THIS?” PG. 143

 During the 1780s, why were Americans so sensitive to the dangers of “aristocratic display”?

 Why did Constitutional delegates compromise on representation and slavery?

THE STATES: EXPERIMENTS IN REPUBLICANISM PG. 136

WHOSE CONSTITUTION? STRUGGLE FOR RATIFICATION PG. 150

 Following independence, why did the states insist on drafting written constitutions?

 What issues separated Federalists from Antifederalists during debates over ratification?

STUMBLING TOWARD A NEW NATIONAL GOVERNMENT PG. 137

FEATURE ESSAY
The Elusive Constitution: Search for Original Intent 
 Why did many Americans regard the Articles of Confederation as inadequate?

 Listen to the Audio File on myhistorylab

